Tennessee, session 114, SB1268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-422(e), is amended by deleting
"ten (10) days" and substituting "fifteen (15) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1268
001496
- 1 -